src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-ngaedarasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈэдараˮмавнандиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈэдараˮмавнандиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈэдараˮмавнанаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈэдараˮмавнандаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈэдараˮмавнандоʼ
#     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈэдараˮмавнани
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈэдараˮмавнан, ӈэдараˮмавнани]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈэдараˮмавнанд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈэдараˮмавнанда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+InfPrf+Tra: ӈэдараˮмаӈэ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбиниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1+OcSg3: ӈэдарарвамиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu1: ӈэдарарваниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбидиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2+OcSg3: ӈэдарарвариʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu2: ӈэдарарвадиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбидиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3+OcSg3: ӈэдарарвадиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScDu3: ӈэдарарвахаʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюнаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбинаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1+OcSg3: ӈэдарарваваˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl1: ӈэдарарваваˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюдаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбидаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2+OcSg3: ӈэдарарвараˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl2: ӈэдарарвадаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюдоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбидоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3+OcSg3: ӈэдарарвадоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScPl3: ӈэдарарваˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюн
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбин
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1+OcSg3: ӈэдарарвав
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg1: ӈэдарарвадмʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбид
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2+OcSg3: ӈэдарарвар
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg2: ӈэдарарван
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcDu3: ӈэдарарвахаюда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcPl3: ӈэдарарбида
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3+OcSg3: ӈэдарарвада
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/des+ScSg3: ӈэдарарва
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюниʼ, ӈэдаравндархахаюниʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархыниʼ, ӈэдаравндархыниʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархамиʼ, ӈэдаравндархамиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: [ӈэдаравандарханиʼ, ӈэдаравндарханиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюдиʼ, ӈэдаравндархахаюдиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархыдиʼ, ӈэдаравндархыдиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархариʼ, ӈэдаравндархариʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: [ӈэдаравандархадиʼ, ӈэдаравндархадиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюдиʼ, ӈэдаравндархахаюдиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархыдиʼ, ӈэдаравндархыдиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархадиʼ, ӈэдаравндархадиʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаʼ, ӈэдаравндархахаʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюнаˮ, ӈэдаравндархахаюнаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархынаˮ, ӈэдаравндархынаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархаваˮ, ӈэдаравндархаваˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: [ӈэдаравандархаваˮ, ӈэдаравндархаваˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюдаˮ, ӈэдаравндархахаюдаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархыдаˮ, ӈэдаравндархыдаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархараˮ, ӈэдаравндархараˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: [ӈэдаравандархадаˮ, ӈэдаравндархадаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюдоʼ, ӈэдаравндархахаюдоʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархыдоʼ, ӈэдаравндархыдоʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархадоʼ, ӈэдаравндархадоʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: [ӈэдаравандархаˮ, ӈэдаравндархаˮ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюн, ӈэдаравндархахаюн]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархын, ӈэдаравндархын]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархав, ӈэдаравндархав]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: [ӈэдаравандархадмʼ, ӈэдаравндархадмʼ]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюд, ӈэдаравндархахаюд]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархыд, ӈэдаравндархыд]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархар, ӈэдаравндархар]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: [ӈэдаравандархан, ӈэдаравндархан]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcDu3: [ӈэдаравандархахаюда, ӈэдаравндархахаюда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcPl3: [ӈэдаравандархыда, ӈэдаравндархыда]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcSg3: [ӈэдаравандархада, ӈэдаравндархада]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: [ӈэдаравандарха, ӈэдаравндарха]
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавыниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэмиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: ӈэдарархавэниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавыдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэриʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: ӈэдарархавэдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавыдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюнаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавынаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэваˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: ӈэдарархавэваˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюдаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавыдаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэраˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: ӈэдарархавэдаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюдоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавыдоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэдоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: ӈэдарархавыˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюн
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавын
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэв
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: ӈэдарархавэдмʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавыд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэр
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: ӈэдарархавэн
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcDu3: ӈэдарархавэхэюда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcPl3: ӈэдарархавыда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcSg3: ӈэдарархавэда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: ӈэдарархавы
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыниʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахамиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu1: ӈэдаранараханиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахариʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu2: ӈэдаранарахадиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахадиʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюнаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхынаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахаваˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl1: ӈэдаранарахаваˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахараˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl2: ӈэдаранарахадаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахадоʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScPl3: ӈэдаранарахаˮ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюн
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхын
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахав
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg1: ӈэдаранарахадмʼ
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыд
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахар
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg2: ӈэдаранарахан
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыда
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахада
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Aor+ScSg3: ӈэдаранараха
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюнинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхынинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахаминзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈэдаранараханинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахаринзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈэдаранарахадинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахадинзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈэдаранарахаханзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюнаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхынаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахаваць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈэдаранарахаваць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахараць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈэдаранарахадаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдонзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдонзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахадонзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈэдаранарахаць
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюнась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхынась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахавась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈэдаранарахадамзь
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахарась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈэдаранараханась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: ӈэдаранарахахаюдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: ӈэдаранарыхыдась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: ӈэдаранарахадась
     ӈэдарась+V+TV+Mod/impfappr+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈэдаранарахась
